Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-111
Legislature; officers; how selected.

The officers of the Legislature shall consist of a speaker, chief clerk, assistant clerk, sergeant at arms, and such other officers as may be deemed necessary for the proper transaction of business, to be elected by the Legislature upon the recommendation of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, except that the board shall make no recommendation as to the speaker.

Laws 1867, § 2, p. 85;

Laws 1885, c. 61, § 2, p. 274;

Laws 1889, c. 86, § 1, p. 572;

R.S.1913, § 3753;

C.S.1922, § 3146;

C.S.1929, § 50-112;

R.S.1943, § 50-111;

Laws 1963, c. 304, § 1, p. 900;

Laws 1967, c. 328, § 6, p. 870;

Laws 1971, LB 37, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 485, § 1.